Utah statutes.
17B-1-637.   Deposit of district funds -- Commingling with personal funds unlawful -- Suspension from office.

The treasurer shall promptly deposit all district funds in the appropriate bank accounts of the district.  It shall be unlawful for any person to commingle district funds with the person's own money.  If it appears that the treasurer or any other officer is making a profit out of public money, or is using the same for any purpose not authorized by law, the treasurer or officer shall be suspended from office.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

